Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 211.690 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services the Health
Access Nurturing Development Services (HANDS) Program as a voluntary
statewide home visitation program, for the purpose of providing assistance to at-risk
parents during the prenatal period and until the child's third birthday. The HANDS
Program recognizes that parents are the primary decision-makers for their children.
The goals of the HANDS Program shall be to:
(a) Facilitate safe and healthy delivery of babies;
(b) Provide information about optimal child growth and human development;
(c) Facilitate the safety and health of homes;[ and]
(d) Encourage greater self-sufficiency of families; and
(e) Provide information about maternal and postpartum depression.
(2) The cabinet shall administer the HANDS Program in cooperation with [the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services and the ]local public health departments. The
voluntary home visitation program may supplement, but shall not duplicate, any
existing program that provides assistance to parents of young children.
(3) The HANDS Program shall include educational components on:
(a) The recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined
in KRS 620.020;
(b) Information related to lactation consultation and breastfeeding information;[
and]
(c) Information related to the importance of safe sleep for babies as a way to
prevent sudden infant death syndrome as defined in KRS 213.011; and
(d) The recognition and treatment of maternal and postpartum depression.
(4) Participants in the HANDS Program shall express informed consent to participate
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/2/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1020
by agreement on a form promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(5) Participants in the HANDS Program shall participate in the home visitation
program through in-person face-to-face methods or through tele-service delivery
methods. For the purposes of this subsection, "tele-service" means a home visitation
service provided through video communication with the HANDS provider, parent,
and child present in real time.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/2/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed